sk-SK: Certifikácia bezpečnosti prilby: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Iné
vi: Chứng nhận an toàn mũ bảo hiểm: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Khác
tr: Kask güvenlik sertifikasyonu: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Diğer
de: Sicherheitszertifizierung des Helms: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Sonstige
nb: Sikkerhetssertifisering for hjelmer: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Annet
it: Certificazione di sicurezza del casco: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Altro
ko: 헬멧 안전 인증: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; 기타
sv: Säkerhetscertifiering för hjälmar: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Övrigt
ro-RO: Certificare de siguranță pentru cască: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Altele
hr-HR: Certifikat o sigurnosti kacige: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Ostalo
pt-BR: Certificação de segurança do capacete: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Outra
sl-SI: Varnostni certifikat čelade: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Drugo
cs: Certifikace bezpečnosti přilby: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Jiná
es: Certificación de seguridad del casco: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Otro
fr: Certification de sécurité du casque: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Autre
fi: Kypärän turvallisuussertifikaatti: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Muu
da: Sikkerhedscertificering for hjelm: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Andet
ja: ヘルメット安全認証: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; その他
el: Πιστοποίηση ασφάλειας κράνους: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Άλλη
nl: Helm veiligheidscertificering: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Overig
pt-PT: Certificação de segurança do capacete: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Outro
zh-TW: 頭盔安全認證: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; 其他
bg-BG: Сертификация за безопасност на каската: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Други
ru: Сертификация безопасности шлема: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Другое
th: การรับรองความปลอดภัยของหมวกนิรภัย: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Šalmo saugos sertifikavimas: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Kita
en: Helmet safety certification: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Other
hu: Sisak biztonsági tanúsítványa: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Egyéb
zh-CN: 头盔安全认证: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; 其他
pl: Certyfikacja bezpieczeństwa kasku: AS/NZS 2063; ASTM F1492; CE; CPSC; CSA; EN 1078; EN 1080; EN 14120; Snell N-94; Inna